Utah statutes.
58-72-102.   Acupuncture licensing -- Definitions.

In addition to the definitions in Section 58-1-102, as used in this chapter:

(1)  "Board" means the Acupuncture Licensing Board created in Section 58-72-201.

(2)  "Licensed acupuncturist," designated as "L.Ac.," means a person who has been licensed under this chapter to practice acupuncture.

(3)  "Moxibustion" means a heat therapy that uses the herb moxa to heat acupuncture points of the body.

(4) (a)  "Practice of acupuncture" means the insertion of acupuncture needles and application of moxibustion to specific areas of the body based on traditional oriental medical diagnosis and modern research as a primary mode of therapy.

(b)  Adjunctive therapies within the scope of the practice of acupuncture may include:

(i)  manual, mechanical, thermal, electrical, light, and electromagnetic treatments based on traditional oriental medical diagnosis and modern research;

(ii)  the recommendation, administration, or provision of dietary guidelines, herbs, supplements, homeopathics, and therapeutic exercise based on traditional oriental medical diagnosis and modern research according to practitioner training; and

(iii)  the practice described in Subsections (4)(a) and (b) on an animal to the extent permitted by:

(A)  Subsection 58-28-307(12);

(B)  the provisions of this chapter; and

(C)  division rule.

(c)  "Practice of acupuncture" does not include:

(i)  the manual manipulation or adjustment of the joints of the body beyond the elastic barrier; or

(ii)  the "manipulation of the articulation of the spinal column" as defined in Section 58-73-102.

(5)  "Unprofessional conduct" is as defined in Sections 58-1-501 and 58-72-503, and as may be further defined by rule.



Amended by Chapter 88, 2012 General Session

